Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 3

Lien Against Aircraft

66-19-301. Filing of lien — Notice.

A lien against any type of conveyance used in the transportation of persons or merchandise through the air, propelled by any sort of power, asserted pursuant to § 66-19-101, shall be filed with the register for the county in which the actions giving rise to the lien occurred, within ninety (90) days after the work is finished or repairs made or materials furnished.

A copy of the notice of lien to be filed shall be sent by first class mail to the last known address of the party for whose account the work was performed, repairs made or materials furnished, and upon any other party known by the party asserting the lien to claim an ownership interest in the subject property.

The notice prescribed in subsection (a) shall contain:

The name of the party asserting the lien;

The name of the party for whom the work was performed, repairs made or materials furnished, and of any other party known to claim an ownership interest in the subject property;

A statement of the amount claimed and the date or dates the amount became due;

A description of the property against which the lien exists;

A brief description of the nature of services giving rise to the lien; and

The signature, under oath, of the party asserting the lien or of such party's authorized representative.

Acts 1990, ch. 756, § 1.

66-19-302. Scope of lien — Parts, repairs and improvements — Lessees.

The lien created by § 66-19-101 also extends to any aircraft engine, aircraft propeller, and any other part or spare part used in, or which under normal circumstances would be used in, an aircraft, aircraft engine or aircraft propeller, whether or not any such component has been attached to or incorporated into an aircraft.

The lien created by § 66-19-101, as to any type of conveyance used in the transportation of persons or merchandise through the air, propelled by any sort of power, shall also arise for any repairs or improvements made or parts or fixtures furnished at the request of any lessee of the subject property or any other party having possession of the subject property with the knowledge or permission of the owner or owner's agent.

Acts 1990, ch. 756, § 1.